Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 7. Armed Services Absentee Voting Law
[Repealed].

§§ 23-9-501 through 23-9-527.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 342, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§§23-9-501 through23-9-511. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3203-201 to 3203-204; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, §§ 201-204]

§§23-9-513 and23-9-515. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3203-204, 3203-205; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, §§ 204, 205; Laws, 1984, ch. 401, §§ 1, 2]

§§23-9-517 through23-9-527. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3203-206 to 3203-211; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, §§ 206-211]